Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.425

Juvenile curfews.

(1) The legislative authority of any county has the authority to enact an ordinance, for the purpose of preserving the public safety or reducing acts of violence by or against juveniles that are occurring at such rates as to be beyond the capacity of the police to assure public safety, establishing times and conditions under which juveniles may be present on the public streets, in the public parks, or in any other public place during specified hours.

(2) The ordinance shall not contain any criminal sanctions for a violation of the ordinance.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 504.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.